Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 36. new text end new text begin Program integrity report. new text end new text begin Beginning November 30, 2026, and annually thereafter, the commissioner must provide a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over children, youth, and families on program integrity functions within the Department of Children, Youth, and Families. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) an update from the Office of Inspector General at the Department of Children, Youth, and Families with historical metrics and descriptive data, including the office's capacity to meet licensing demands and data for the past five years on the number of maltreatment reports and licensing complaints received, the results of maltreatment investigations, the number of licenses issued for each provider type, the number of licensing investigations and reviews completed, and the number of correction orders issued; and new text end new text begin (2) an update from the Office of Inspector General at the Department of Children, Youth, and Families that generally includes caseload, site visit data, the number of child care assistance program investigations and administrative reviews within the past five years, recipient fraud investigation results involving multiple benefits from the past five years, and updates on major fraud investigations. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 45. new text end new text begin Program integrity report. new text end new text begin Beginning November 30, 2026, and annually thereafter, the commissioner must provide a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over human services on program integrity functions within the Department of Human Services. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) an update from the Background Studies Division within the Office of Inspector General at the Department of Human Services with historical metrics and descriptive data on background studies and licensure, including the number of background studies completed within the past five years and the number of disqualifications that occurred; new text end new text begin (2) an update from the Licensing Division within the Office of Inspector General at the Department of Human Services with historical metrics and descriptive data, including the division's capacity to meet licensing demands and data for the past five years on the number of maltreatment reports and licensing complaints received, the results of maltreatment investigations, the number of licenses issued for each provider type, the number of licensing investigations and reviews completed, and the number of correction orders issued; and new text end new text begin (3) an update from the Financial Fraud and Abuse Investigations Division within the Office of Inspector General at the Department of Human Services that generally includes caseload, screening and site visit data, the number of provider medical assistance managed care investigations within the past five years, the number of screening investigations within the past five years, and updates on major fraud investigations. new text end